Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Unauthorized Insurers Process Act

§ 26-12-201.
Short title; interpretation of article.

This article constitutes and may be cited as the “Unauthorized Insurers Process Act”.

This article shall be so interpreted as to carry out its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 234; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-234; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-104; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-12-202.
Commissioner as agent for service.

Solicitation, carrying out or delivery of any insurance contract, by mail or otherwise, within this state by an unauthorized insurer, or the performance within this state of any other service or transaction connected with insurance by or on behalf of the insurer:

Constitutes the insurer’s appointment of the commissioner and his successors in office as its attorney, upon whom may be served all lawful process issued within this state in any action or proceeding against the insurer arising out of any such contract or transaction; and

Signifies the insurer’s agreement that any such service of process has the same legal effect and validity as personal service of process upon it in this state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 235; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-235; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-105; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to appointment of commissioner as attorney for service of process, see §§

26-3-121

,

26-3-122

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The ‘Long-Arm’ Statute: Wyoming Expands Jurisdiction of the State Courts over Nonresidents,” 4 Land & Water L. Rev. 235 (1969).

§ 26-12-203.
Service of process generally.

Service of process upon any insurer pursuant to W.S.

26-12-202

shall be made in accordance with W.S.

26-3-122

, and service of process is sufficient if it complies with that section.

Service of process in any such action, suit or proceeding, in addition to the manner provided in subsection (a) of this section, is valid if:

Served upon any person within this state, who in this state on behalf of the insurer, is:

Soliciting insurance;

Making any contract of insurance or issuing or delivering any policies or written contracts of insurance; or

Collecting or receiving any premium for insurance; and

Otherwise complies with W.S. 26-3-122(d).

No plaintiff or complainant is entitled to a judgment by default under this section until the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of the filing of the affidavit of compliance.

Nothing in this section limits or abridges the right to serve any process, notice or demand upon any insurer in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 236; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-236; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-106; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-12-204.
Exemptions from service of process provisions.

W.S.

26-12-202

and

26-12-203

do not apply to surplus line insurance lawfully carried out under chapter 11, or to reinsurance, or to any action or proceeding against an unauthorized insurer arising out of any of the following if the policy or contract contains a provision designating the commissioner as its attorney for the acceptance of service of lawful process in any action or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of an insured or beneficiary arising out of that policy, or if the insurer enters a general appearance in any such action:

Wet marine and transportation insurance;

Insurance on subjects located, resident or to be performed wholly outside this state, or on vehicles or aircraft owned and principally garaged outside this state;

Insurance on property or operations of railroads engaged in interstate commerce; or

Insurance on aircraft or cargo of that aircraft, or against liability, other than employer’s liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of that aircraft.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 237; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-237; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-107; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-12-205.
Defense of action by unauthorized insurer.

Before an unauthorized insurer files or causes to be filed any pleading in any action or proceeding instituted against it under W.S.

26-12-202

and

26-12-203

, that insurer shall:

Procure a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state; or

Deposit with the clerk of the court in which the action or proceeding is pending cash or securities, or file with the clerk a bond with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the court, in an amount the court fixes sufficient to secure the payment of any final judgment which may be rendered in the action, except that the court may make an order dispensing with the deposit or bond if the insurer shows to the court’s satisfaction that it:

Maintains in a state of the United States funds or securities sufficient and available to satisfy any final judgment which may be entered in the action or proceeding; and

Will pay any final judgment entered therein without requiring suit to be brought on the judgment in the state where the funds or securities are located.

The court in any action or proceeding in which service is made in the manner provided in W.S.

26-12-203

may order a postponement as necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section and to defend the action.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section prevents an unauthorized insurer from filing a motion to quash or to set aside the service of any process made in the manner provided in W.S.

26-12-203

on the ground either:

That the unauthorized insurer did not engage in any of the acts enumerated in W.S.

26-12-202

; or

That the person on whom service was made pursuant to W.S.

26-12-203

was not engaged in any of the acts enumerated in W.S.

26-12-202

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 238; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-238; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-108; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-12-206.
Attorney fees in actions against unauthorized insurer.

In any action against an unauthorized insurer, if the insurer fails for thirty (30) days after demand prior to the commencement of the action to make payment in accordance with the terms of the contract, and it appears to the court that the refusal is without reasonable cause, the court shall allow to the plaintiff a reasonable attorney fee and include that fee in any judgment that may be rendered in the action. The fee shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100.00). Failure of an insurer to defend any such action is prima facie evidence that its failure to make payment was without reasonable cause.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 239; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-239; W.S. 1977, § 26-12-109; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Attorneys' fees are recoverable if there is specific statutory authority

therefor. Schaefer v. Lampert Lumber Co., 591 P.2d 1225,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 382

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Preston v. Natrona Serv., Inc., 489 P.2d 622,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1971).